New Jersey, session 221, S2155.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a.  As used in this section, sports wagering partnership means a partnership or contractual agreement between a sports wagering operator or intermediary and 1[an] a public1 institution of higher education, including an athletic department or booster club of the institution, for access to advertise in the institutions stadiums and other facilities, in digital and broadcast sports content, and through other means. b.  A public institution of higher education shall not participate in a sports wagering partnership as defined by subsection a. of this section. 1c.  The provisions of subsection b. of this section shall not apply to a foundation institutionally related to a public institution of higher education, provided that a sports wagering partnership into which the foundation enters shall not include direct advertising or marketing to students enrolled in the institution. Direct advertising or marketing shall include advertising or marketing at on-campus locations and off-campus locations associated with the public institution of higher education, and any electronic advertising or marketing explicitly directed to students enrolled in the institution. d. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to apply to any partnership between a public institution of higher education and casino licensees, sports wagering licensees, or their contracted operators which the partnership is established for academic purposes or provides experiential learning opportunities to students enrolled in the institution.1 2. This act shall take effect immediately.